Wyoming, session 2025, HB0079.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 22-21-110 is amended to read:
22-21-110. Ballot canvass; results certified;
declaration; effect of defeat.
(a) Immediately after the closing of the polls, the
counting board shall proceed to count the ballots. The
results disclosed by the count shall be certified by the
counting board to the clerk of the political subdivision.
Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this
section, if the majority of the ballots cast on a bond
question is in favor of the issuance of the bonds, the
proposal shall be approved, and the governing body of the
political subdivision, in the manner provided by law, shall
then proceed to declare the results of said election, and
complete the printing, execution, advertising, and sale of
the bonds, but if the majority is opposed to such issuance,
the proposal to issue bonds for the same general purpose
shall not again be submitted to election within a period of
twelve (12) months or as otherwise provided by law.
(b) For any bond election that is held on a day other
than the same day as a general election, the proposal shall
not be approved unless the majority of the ballots cast are
in favor of the proposal and the total number of ballots
cast is not less than twenty‑five percent (25%) plus one (1)
of the number of qualified electors who voted within the
1

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0079
ENROLLED ACT NO. 55, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
political subdivision in the general election immediately
preceding the bond election. If the proposal is not
approved due to an insufficient number of qualified
electors voting, the proposal to issue bonds may be brought
at the next general election or at another time pursuant to
this act. This subsection shall apply only to bond
elections held in accordance with this article.
Section 2. Nothing in this act shall be construed to
impact a bond election held prior to July 1, 2025.
Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2025.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the House.
Chief Clerk
2